Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2651
Encumbrance or transaction involving conflict of interest; voidable; exceptions.

Any sale or encumbrance to a conservator, his spouse, agent or attorney, or any corporation or trust in which he has a substantial beneficial interest, or any transaction which is affected by a substantial conflict of interest is voidable unless the transaction is approved by the court after notice to interested persons and others as directed by the court.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 269, UPC § 5-422.